Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 215.030 is amended to read:
215.030. (1) The county planning commission shall consist of five, seven or nine  members ap-
pointed by the governing body for four-year terms,  or until their respective successors are appointed
and qualified[ ; provided that  in the  first instance ], except that  the terms of  the initial members
[shall] must  be staggered for one, two, three and four years.
(2) A commission member may be removed by  the governing body, after hearing, for misconduct
or nonperformance of duty.
(3) Any vacancy on the commission [ shall] must  be filled by the governing  body for the unex-
pired term.
(4) Members of the commission  shall serve without compensation other than reimbursement for
duly authorized expenses.
(5) Members of a commission [ shall] must  be  residents of the various geographic areas of the
county. If the  commission has five or fewer members,  no more than two voting members
[shall] may  be engaged principally in the buying, selling or developing of real estate for  profit, as
individuals, or be members  of any partnership or officers or employees of any corporation that is
engaged principally in the buying, selling or developing of real estate for  profit. No more than two
voting members [ shall] may  be engaged in the same kind of occupation,  business, trade or profes-
sion.
(6) The governing body may designate one or more officers of the county to be nonvoting mem-
bers of the commission.
(7) Except for subsection (5) of this  section, the governing body may provide by ordinance for
alternative rules to those specified in this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 227.030 is amended to read:
227.030. (1) Not more than two members of a city planning commission may be  city officers, who
shall serve as ex officio nonvoting members.
(2) A member of such a commission may be removed by the appointing authority,  after hearing,
for misconduct or nonperformance of duty.
(3) Any vacancy in [ such a commission shall ] the commission must  be  filled by the appointing
authority for the unexpired term of the predecessor in the office.
(4) If the commission has five or fewer members,  no more than  two voting members of the
commission may engage principally in the buying, selling or developing of real  estate for profit as
Enrolled House Bill 3136 (HB 3136-A) Page 1
individuals, or be members of any partnership, or officers or employees of any  corporation, that
engages principally in the buying, selling or developing of  real estate for profit. No more than two
members [ shall] may  be engaged in the same kind of occupation, business, trade or profession.
Passed by House April 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3136 (HB 3136-A) Page 2